Hawaii statutes.
[§182-9.5] Unitization. Upon motion by
the board or petition filed by any mining lessee, the board, in its discretion,
may order such lessees or owners of mineral rights on adjoining properties to
collectively adopt, and operate under, a cooperative or unit plan of
development, if the board finds that such a plan will prevent the waste of any
mineral, increase the ultimate recovery, avoid the drilling, digging, or
excavating of any unnecessary well, or for such other reason that would
encourage and promote the development of any mineral resource. [L 1978, c 135,
§8]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next